Utah statutes.
26-1-32.   Severability of code provisions.

If any provision of this code or the application of any such provision to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this code which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this code are declared to be severable.

